fi/fi_FI.aff
FLAG num
SFX 19405 N 1
SFX 19405 tua duimmekin .
SFX 19406 N 1
SFX 19406 tua duinhan .
SFX 19407 N 1
SFX 19407 tua duinkaan .
SFX 19408 N 1
SFX 19408 tua duinko .
SFX 19409 N 1
SFX 19409 tua duinpa .
SFX 19410 N 1
SFX 19410 tua duitkin .
SFX 19411 N 1
SFX 19411 tua duitko .
SFX 19412 N 1
SFX 19412 tua duitteko .
SFX 19413 N 1
SFX 19413 tua dummekaan .
SFX 19414 N 1
SFX 19414 tua dummekin .
SFX 19415 N 1
SFX 19415 tua dummeko .
SFX 19416 N 1
SFX 19416 tua dunhan .
SFX 19417 N 1
SFX 19417 tua dunkaan .
SFX 19418 N 1
SFX 19418 tua dunkin .
SFX 19419 N 1
SFX 19419 tua dunkohan .
SFX 19420 N 1
SFX 19420 tua dutaankaan .
SFX 19421 N 1
SFX 19421 tua dutaankin .
SFX 19422 N 1
SFX 19422 tua dutaankohan .
SFX 19423 N 1
SFX 19423 tua dutan .
SFX 19424 N 1
SFX 19424 tua dutkin .
SFX 19425 N 1
SFX 19425 tua duttaisiinkin .
SFX 19426 N 1
SFX 19426 tua duttaisin .
SFX 19427 N 1
SFX 19427 tua duttanee .
SFX 19428 N 1
SFX 19428 tua duttaneen .
SFX 19429 N 1
SFX 19429 tua dutteko .
SFX 19430 N 1
SFX 19430 tua duttuasi .
SFX 19431 N 1
SFX 19431 a isinkaan .
SFX 19432 N 1
SFX 19432 a ivatkaan .
SFX 19433 N 1
SFX 19433 a nemme .
SFX 19434 N 1
SFX 19434 a upahan .
SFX 19435 N 1
SFX 19435 ut en .
SFX 19436 N 1
SFX 19436 ia eimmista .
SFX 19437 Y 1
SFX 19437 ko olla .
PFX 19437 Y 1
PFX 19437 juhannus juhannuksen .
SFX 19438 N 1
SFX 19438 svietto ksenvieton .
SFX 19439 N 1
SFX 19439 svietto ksenvietossa .
SFX 19440 N 1
SFX 19440 svietto ksenvietosta .
SFX 19441 N 1
SFX 19441 svietto ksenvietto .
SFX 19442 N 1
SFX 19442 svietto ksenviettoa .
SFX 19443 N 1
SFX 19443 svietto ksenviettoon .
SFX 19444 N 1
SFX 19444 a iessa .
SFX 19445 N 1
SFX 19445 a iinne .
SFX 19446 N 1
SFX 19446 a ija .
SFX 19447 N 1
SFX 19447 a issanne .
SFX 19448 N 1
SFX 19448 a istanne .
SFX 19449 N 1
SFX 19449 kä gätkin .
SFX 19450 N 1
SFX 19450 ka aksemme .
SFX 19451 N 1
SFX 19451 ma piakin .
SFX 19452 N 1
SFX 19452 s itaan .
SFX 19453 N 1
SFX 19453 a staa .
SFX 19454 N 1
SFX 19454 a ttaneen .
SFX 19455 N 1
SFX 19455 a ttavassa .
SFX 19456 N 1
SFX 19456 a ttiinko .
SFX 19457 N 1
SFX 19457 aan etaankin .
PFX 19458 N 1
PFX 19458 julistus julistuksen .
SFX 19459 N 1
SFX 19459 jeta kenee .
SFX 19460 N 1
SFX 19460 jeta kenen .
SFX 19461 N 1
SFX 19461 jeta keni .
SFX 19462 N 1
SFX 19462 on tomiakin .
SFX 19463 N 1
SFX 19463 en seella .
SFX 19464 N 1
SFX 19464 ta emaani .
SFX 19465 N 1
SFX 19465 ta emaankaan .
SFX 19466 N 1
SFX 19466 ta emaankin .
SFX 19467 N 1
SFX 19467 ta emaansa .
SFX 19468 N 1
SFX 19468 ta emaasi .
SFX 19469 N 1
SFX 19469 ta emaksi .
SFX 19470 N 1
SFX 19470 ta emallaan .
SFX 19471 N 1
SFX 19471 ta emallani .
SFX 19472 N 1
SFX 19472 ta emalleen .
SFX 19473 N 1
SFX 19473 ta emalta .
SFX 19474 N 1
SFX 19474 ta emamme .
SFX 19475 N 1
SFX 19475 ta emanne .
SFX 19476 N 1
SFX 19476 ta emassaan .
SFX 19477 N 1
SFX 19477 ta emassamme .
SFX 19478 N 1
SFX 19478 ta emassani .
SFX 19479 N 1
SFX 19479 ta emastaan .
SFX 19480 N 1
SFX 19480 ta emastamme .
SFX 19481 N 1
SFX 19481 ta emastani .
SFX 19482 N 1
SFX 19482 ta emastasi .
SFX 19483 N 1
SFX 19483 ta ematon .
SFX 19484 N 1
SFX 19484 ta emiani .
SFX 19485 N 1
SFX 19485 ta emiemme .
SFX 19486 N 1
SFX 19486 ta emieni .
SFX 19487 N 1
SFX 19487 ta emiini .
SFX 19488 N 1
SFX 19488 ta emiinsa .
SFX 19489 N 1
SFX 19489 ta emilla .
SFX 19490 N 1
SFX 19490 ta emillaan .
SFX 19491 N 1
SFX 19491 ta emille .
SFX 19492 N 1
SFX 19492 ta emilta .
SFX 19493 N 1
SFX 19493 ta emina .
SFX 19494 N 1
SFX 19494 ta emissa .
SFX 19495 N 1
SFX 19495 ta emissaan .
SFX 19496 N 1
SFX 19496 ta emissani .
SFX 19497 N 1
SFX 19497 ta emistaan .
SFX 19498 N 1
SFX 19498 ta emistamme .
SFX 19499 N 1
SFX 19499 ta emistani .
SFX 19500 N 1
SFX 19500 ta etko .
SFX 19501 N 1
SFX 19501 ta ko .
SFX 19502 N 1
SFX 19502 ta seella .
SFX 19503 N 1
SFX 19503 ta seelta .
SFX 19504 N 1
SFX 19504 ta seena .
SFX 19505 N 1
SFX 19505 ta seeseen .
SFX 19506 N 1
SFX 19506 ta seessa .
SFX 19507 N 1
SFX 19507 ta seesta .
SFX 19508 N 1
SFX 19508 ta seilla .
SFX 19509 N 1
SFX 19509 ta sen .
SFX 19510 N 1
SFX 19510 ta set .
SFX 19511 N 1
SFX 19511 0 vaan .
SFX 19512 N 1
SFX 19512 0 vakseen .
SFX 19513 N 1
SFX 19513 0 vassa .
SFX 19514 N 1
SFX 19514 0 vasta .
SFX 19515 N 1
SFX 19515 0 vien .
SFX 19516 N 1
SFX 19516 0 viin .
SFX 19517 N 1
SFX 19517 0 viksi .
SFX 19518 N 1
SFX 19518 0 ville .
SFX 19519 N 1
SFX 19519 0 vilta .
SFX 19520 N 1
SFX 19520 0 vista .
SFX 19521 N 1
SFX 19521 a iinko .
SFX 19522 N 1
SFX 19522 a uakin .
SFX 19523 N 1
SFX 19523 a uamme .
SFX 19524 N 1
SFX 19524 a uksikin .
SFX 19525 N 1
SFX 19525 ta u .
SFX 19526 N 1
SFX 19526 ta uista .
SFX 19527 N 1
SFX 19527 ta uksi .
SFX 19528 N 1
SFX 19528 ta una .
SFX 19529 N 1
SFX 19529 ta usta .
SFX 19530 N 1
SFX 19530 a vapaa .
SFX 19531 N 1
SFX 19531 pa lupa .
SFX 19532 N 1
SFX 19532 pa lupaa .
SFX 19533 N 1
SFX 19533 pa lupia .
SFX 19534 N 1
SFX 19534 kea mettu .
SFX 19535 N 1
SFX 19535 kea metulla .
SFX 19536 N 1
SFX 19536 kea metusta .
SFX 19537 N 1
SFX 19537 na tava .
SFX 19538 N 1
SFX 19538 na tu .
SFX 19539 N 1
SFX 19539 n tkin .
SFX 19540 N 1
SFX 19540 toimenpide 0 .
SFX 19541 N 1
SFX 19541 0 massaan .
SFX 19542 N 1
SFX 19542 0 denkin .
SFX 19543 N 1
SFX 19543 s ttahan .
SFX 19544 N 1
SFX 19544 skipeys denkipeydestä .
SFX 19545 N 1
SFX 19545 skipeä denkipeitä .
SFX 19546 N 1
SFX 19546 skipeä denkipeät .
SFX 19547 N 1
SFX 19547 skipeän denkipeän .
SFX 19548 N 1
SFX 19548 un tuun .
SFX 19549 N 1
SFX 19549 0 tar .
SFX 19550 N 1
SFX 19550 0 uta .
SFX 19551 N 1
SFX 19551 a ten .
SFX 19552 N 1
SFX 19552 a tenkin .
SFX 19553 N 1
SFX 19553 a tensa .
PFX 19554 N 1
PFX 19554 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19555 Y 1
SFX 19555 0 ksia .
PFX 19555 Y 1
PFX 19555 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19556 Y 1
SFX 19556 s kseen .
PFX 19556 Y 1
PFX 19556 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19557 Y 1
SFX 19557 s kseensa .
PFX 19557 Y 1
PFX 19557 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19558 Y 1
SFX 19558 s kseksi .
PFX 19558 Y 1
PFX 19558 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19559 Y 1
SFX 19559 s ksella .
PFX 19559 Y 1
PFX 19559 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19560 Y 1
SFX 19560 s kselle .
PFX 19560 Y 1
PFX 19560 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19561 Y 1
SFX 19561 s ksemme .
PFX 19561 Y 1
PFX 19561 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19562 Y 1
SFX 19562 s ksen .
PFX 19562 Y 1
PFX 19562 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19563 Y 1
SFX 19563 s ksena .
PFX 19563 Y 1
PFX 19563 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19564 Y 1
SFX 19564 s ksenne .
PFX 19564 Y 1
PFX 19564 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19565 Y 1
SFX 19565 s ksensa .
PFX 19565 Y 1
PFX 19565 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19566 Y 1
SFX 19566 s ksessa .
PFX 19566 Y 1
PFX 19566 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19567 Y 1
SFX 19567 s ksessaan .
PFX 19567 Y 1
PFX 19567 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19568 Y 1
SFX 19568 s ksesta .
PFX 19568 Y 1
PFX 19568 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19569 Y 1
SFX 19569 s kset .
PFX 19569 Y 1
PFX 19569 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19570 Y 1
SFX 19570 s ksia .
PFX 19570 Y 1
PFX 19570 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19571 Y 1
SFX 19571 s ksiaan .
PFX 19571 Y 1
PFX 19571 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19572 Y 1
SFX 19572 s ksien .
PFX 19572 Y 1
PFX 19572 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19573 Y 1
SFX 19573 s ksiimme .
PFX 19573 Y 1
PFX 19573 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19574 Y 1
SFX 19574 s ksiin .
PFX 19574 Y 1
PFX 19574 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19575 Y 1
SFX 19575 s ksiinsa .
PFX 19575 Y 1
PFX 19575 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19576 Y 1
SFX 19576 s ksilla .
PFX 19576 Y 1
PFX 19576 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19577 Y 1
SFX 19577 s ksille .
PFX 19577 Y 1
PFX 19577 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19578 Y 1
SFX 19578 s ksineen .
PFX 19578 Y 1
PFX 19578 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19579 Y 1
SFX 19579 s ksissa .
PFX 19579 Y 1
PFX 19579 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19580 Y 1
SFX 19580 s ksissaan .
PFX 19580 Y 1
PFX 19580 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19581 Y 1
SFX 19581 s ksissamme .
PFX 19581 Y 1
PFX 19581 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19582 Y 1
SFX 19582 s ksista .
PFX 19582 Y 1
PFX 19582 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19583 Y 1
SFX 19583 0 kin .
PFX 19583 Y 1
PFX 19583 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19584 Y 1
SFX 19584 0 ta .
PFX 19584 Y 1
PFX 19584 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19585 Y 1
SFX 19585 0 taan .
PFX 19585 Y 1
PFX 19585 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19586 Y 1
SFX 19586 0 ten .
PFX 19586 Y 1
PFX 19586 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19587 Y 1
SFX 19587 0 lle .
PFX 19587 Y 1
PFX 19587 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19588 Y 1
SFX 19588 0 n .
PFX 19588 Y 1
PFX 19588 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19589 Y 1
SFX 19589 0 ssä .
PFX 19589 Y 1
PFX 19589 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19590 Y 1
SFX 19590 0 stä .
PFX 19590 Y 1
PFX 19590 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19591 Y 1
SFX 19591 0 ä .
PFX 19591 Y 1
PFX 19591 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19592 Y 1
SFX 19592 0 än .
PFX 19592 Y 1
PFX 19592 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19593 Y 1
SFX 19593 s ksestä .
PFX 19593 Y 1
PFX 19593 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19594 Y 1
SFX 19594 0 tä .
PFX 19594 Y 1
PFX 19594 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19595 Y 1
SFX 19595 i enä .
PFX 19595 Y 1
PFX 19595 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19596 Y 1
SFX 19596 a oja .
PFX 19596 Y 1
PFX 19596 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19597 Y 1
SFX 19597 0 ön .
PFX 19597 Y 1
PFX 19597 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19598 Y 1
SFX 19598 tö össä .
PFX 19598 Y 1
PFX 19598 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19599 Y 1
SFX 19599 0 tta .
PFX 19599 Y 1
PFX 19599 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19600 Y 1
SFX 19600 ne teen .
PFX 19600 Y 1
PFX 19600 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19601 Y 1
SFX 19601 0 ihin .
PFX 19601 Y 1
PFX 19601 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19602 Y 1
SFX 19602 0 ja .
PFX 19602 Y 1
PFX 19602 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19603 Y 1
SFX 19603 0 jen .
PFX 19603 Y 1
PFX 19603 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19604 Y 1
SFX 19604 0 t .
PFX 19604 Y 1
PFX 19604 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19605 Y 1
SFX 19605 0 jaan .
PFX 19605 Y 1
PFX 19605 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19606 Y 1
SFX 19606 ki in .
PFX 19606 Y 1
PFX 19606 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19607 Y 1
SFX 19607 ki ista .
PFX 19607 Y 1
PFX 19607 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19608 Y 1
SFX 19608 0 a .
PFX 19608 Y 1
PFX 19608 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19609 Y 1
SFX 19609 as paan .
PFX 19609 Y 1
PFX 19609 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19610 Y 1
SFX 19610 ka aksi .
PFX 19610 Y 1
PFX 19610 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19611 Y 1
SFX 19611 ku vut .
PFX 19611 Y 1
PFX 19611 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19612 Y 1
SFX 19612 ät illä .
PFX 19612 Y 1
PFX 19612 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19613 Y 1
SFX 19613 ä ien .
PFX 19613 Y 1
PFX 19613 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19614 Y 1
SFX 19614 a ojen .
PFX 19614 Y 1
PFX 19614 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19615 Y 1
SFX 19615 i ejä .
PFX 19615 Y 1
PFX 19615 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19616 Y 1
SFX 19616 0 en .
PFX 19616 Y 1
PFX 19616 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19617 Y 1
SFX 19617 ta nan .
PFX 19617 Y 1
PFX 19617 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19618 Y 1
SFX 19618 0 issä .
PFX 19618 Y 1
PFX 19618 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19619 Y 1
SFX 19619 0 istä .
PFX 19619 Y 1
PFX 19619 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19620 Y 1
SFX 19620 0 jä .
PFX 19620 Y 1
PFX 19620 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19621 Y 1
SFX 19621 s teen .
PFX 19621 Y 1
PFX 19621 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19622 N 1
SFX 19622 palvonta npalvonnan .
SFX 19623 N 1
SFX 19623 pelko npelko .
SFX 19624 N 1
SFX 19624 pelko npelkoa .
SFX 19625 N 1
SFX 19625 pelko npelkoon .
SFX 19626 N 1
SFX 19626 pilkka npilkaksi .
SFX 19627 N 1
SFX 19627 pilkka npilkalta .
SFX 19628 N 1
SFX 19628 pilkka npilkan .
SFX 19629 N 1
SFX 19629 pilkka npilkasta .
SFX 19630 N 1
SFX 19630 pilkka npilkka .
SFX 19631 N 1
SFX 19631 pilkka npilkkaa .
SFX 19632 N 1
SFX 19632 pilkka npilkkaan .
SFX 19633 N 1
SFX 19633 pilkka npilkkana .
SFX 19634 Y 1
SFX 19634 a ia .
PFX 19634 Y 1
PFX 19634 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19635 Y 1
SFX 19635 nen set .
PFX 19635 Y 1
PFX 19635 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19636 Y 1
SFX 19636 i eja .
PFX 19636 Y 1
PFX 19636 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19637 Y 1
SFX 19637 0 in .
PFX 19637 Y 1
PFX 19637 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19638 Y 1
SFX 19638 e teen .
PFX 19638 Y 1
PFX 19638 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19639 Y 1
SFX 19639 0 ita .
PFX 19639 Y 1
PFX 19639 jumala jumalan .
SFX 19640 N 1
SFX 19640 poika npoikia .
SFX 19641 N 1
SFX 19641 ar tareni .
SFX 19642 N 1
SFX 19642 ar tarensa .
SFX 19643 N 1
SFX 19643 ar tarista .
SFX 19644 N 1
SFX 19644 on tomain .
SFX 19645 N 1
SFX 19645 s destansa .
SFX 19646 N 1
SFX 19646 äiti näidille .
SFX 19647 N 1
SFX 19647 äiti näidin .
SFX 19648 N 1
SFX 19648 nen ste .
SFX 19649 N 1
SFX 19649 tua uinkin .
SFX 19650 N 1
SFX 19650 ata paamasta .
SFX 19651 N 1
SFX 19651 ata paamatta .
SFX 19652 N 1
SFX 19652 ata paatte .
